------

https://www.nytimes.com/2017/05/19/us/politics/trump-russia-comey.html

	“I just fired the head of the F.B.I. He was crazy, a real nut job,” Mr. Trump said, according to the document, which was read to The New York Times by an American official. “I faced great pressure because of Russia. That’s taken off.”

	Mr. Trump added, “I’m not under investigation.”


- Fired Comey
- He's crazy
- Faced great pressure because of Russia. That's taken off.
- "I' not under investigation"


how the fuck do you read that?

It's like it's desgned to be confusing/divisive


Why will the media find and release the shitty dossier, but not any of these transcripts?


------

https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/05/11/president_trumps_full_interview_with_lester_holt.html
	President Trump's Full Interview With Lester Holt: Firing Of James Comey


	TRUMP: Look, he's a showboat. He's a grandstander.

	The FBI has been in turmoil. You know that, I know that, everybody knows that.

	You take a look at the FBI a year ago, it was in virtual turmoil -- less than a year ago. It hasn't recovered from that.


This supposed to be his reason for firing him? or a list

------


	HOLT: Monday you met with the Deputy Attorney General Rod Rosenstein.

	TRUMP: Right.

	HOLT: Did you ask for a recommendation?

	TRUMP: What I did is I was going to fire Comey. My decision. It was not...

	HOLT: You had made the decision before they came into your office (ph).

	TRUMP: I -- I was going to fire Comey. I -- there's no good time to do it, by the way.


dodges question, says (I think) wanted to fire Comey before the Rosenstein reccomendation


------


	They...

	HOLT: Because in your letter, you said...

	(CROSSTALK)

	TRUMP: They -- they were...

	HOLT: ...I -- I accepted -- accepted their recommendations.

	TRUMP: Yeah, well, they also...

	HOLT: So, you had already made the decision.

	TRUMP: Oh, I was going to fire regardless of recommendation.

	HOLT: So, there was...


http://thehill.com/blogs/pundits-blog/the-administration/332630-full-letter-deputy-attorney-general-recommends-trump


Right, Trump accepted the letter from Rosenstein, but he had alreaddy decided to fire Comey beforehand


------



https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/05/11/president_trumps_full_interview_with_lester_holt.html	He had made a recommendation. But regardless of recommendation, I was going to fire Comey knowing there was no good time to do it

	And in fact, when I decided to just do it, I said to myself -- I said, you know, this Russia thing with Trump and Russia is a made-up story. It's an excuse by the Democrats for having lost an election that they should've won.

	And the reason they should've won it is the electoral college is almost impossible for a Republican to win. It's very hard because you start off at such a disadvantage. So, everybody was thinking they should've won the election. This was an excuse for having lost an election.

	HOLT: But were -- are you angry...

	(CROSSTALK)

	HOLT: ...angry with Mr. Comey because of his Russia investigation?

	TRUMP: I just want somebody that's competent. I am a big fan of the FBI. I love the FBI.

	HOLT: But were you a fan of...

	(CROSSTALK)

	TRUMP: ...people of the FBI.

	HOLT: him taking up that investigation?

	TRUMP: I think that -- about the Hillary Clinton investigation?

	HOLT: No, about -- about the Russian investigation and possible...

	TRUMP: No, I don't care...

	HOLT: ...links between...

	TRUMP: Look -- look, let me tell you. As far as I'm concerned, I want that thing to be absolutely done properly.

	When I did this now, I said I probably maybe will confuse people. Maybe I'll expand that -- you know, I'll lengthen the time because it should be over with. It should -- in my opinion, should've been over with a long time ago because it -- all it is an excuse.

	But I said to myself I might even lengthen out the investigation. But I have to do the right thing for the American people.

	He's the wrong man for that position.


wtf is he talking about?

Does he honestly think FBI invsetigations have time limits or something?

what a fucking moron


or is he saying he complicated the investigation?


Ok it sounds like, maybe, he knew or suspected that firing the FBI director would affect the Russia investigation, but "have to do the right thing for the American people"


-------

	HOLT: Let me ask you about your termination letter to Mr. Comey. You write, "I greatly appreciate you informing me on three separate occasions that I am not under investigation." Why did you put that in there?

	TRUMP: Because he told me that. I mean, he told me that.

	HOLT: He told you, you weren't under investigation with...

	TRUMP: Yeah, and I...

	HOLT: ...regard to the Russian investigation.

	TRUMP: ...I've heard that -- I've heard that from others. I think...

	HOLT: Was it in a phone call? Did you meet face to face?


Maybe Trump didn't want it to look like he was firing Comey for the Russia investigation? would be consciousness of guilt I think?


------

	TRUMP: I actually asked him, yes. I said if it's possible, would you let me know am I under investigation. He said you are not under investigation.

	HOLT: But he's -- he's given sworn testimony that there's an ongoing investigation into the Trump campaign and possible collusion with the Russian government. You were the centerpiece of the Trump campaign.


Holt doesn't believe him


------

	HOLT: Did you ask him to drop the investigation?

	TRUMP: No, never.

	HOLT: Did anyone from the White House...

	TRUMP: No. In fact, I want the investigation speeded up...



the "I want the investigation speeded up" checks out with Comey's testimony, first part clearly does not...


------


	HOLT: Did anyone from the White House ask him to -- to end the investigation?

	TRUMP: No, no. Why would we do that?


Does he show he knows its wrong to do that here?

defense for Trump could be he knew asking FBI to drop an investigation is wrong/illegal, but didn't know is statements would be interpreted that way


------

	TRUMP: Not that I know of. Look, I want to find out if there was a problem with an election having to do with Russia. Or by the way any -- but -- any -- anybody else. Any other country.

	And I want that to be so strong and so good. And I want it to happen.

	I also want to have a really competent, capable director. He's not. He's a show boater.

	He's not my man or not my man. I didn't appoint him. He was appointed long before me.

	But I want somebody who's going to do a great job. And I will tell you, we're looking at candidates right now who could be spectacular. And that's what I want for the FBI.


Makes it harder to say "Trump said he fired me beaucse of the RUssia investigation," among other statements by him


also "not my man" and "I didn't appoint him" is telling--Trump thinks Comey part of Obama conspiracy to ruin him?


------


	HOLT: What you said a moment ago about supporting the idea of investigation. A lot of people would find it hard to believe that the man who just said that tweeted very recently it's a total hoax. It's a taxpayer charade.

	TRUMP: Oh, I think that looking into me and the campaign -- look, I have nothing to do -- this was set up by the Democrats. There is no collusion between me and my campaign and the Russians.

	The other thing is the Russians did not affect the vote. And everybody seems to think that.

	HOLT: There is an investigation underway though, an FBI investigation. Is that a charade?

	TRUMP: Well, I don't know if it's an FBI or if it's -- there's so many investigations. I don't know if it's an FBI investigation or if it's Congress, if it's the Senate and the House...

	HOLT: Well, James Comey testified there was an FBI investigation...

	TRUMP: Well, yeah, but I think they're also helping the House and the Senate. So, you probably have FBI. But you have House, you have Senate. They have other investigations.

	HOLT: But when you put out tweets it's a total hoax. It's a taxpayer charade. And you're looking for a new FBI director, are you not sending that person a message to lay off?

	TRUMP: No, I'm not doing that. I think that we have to get back to work. But I want to find out -- I want to get to the bottom.

	If Russia hacked -- if Russia did anything having to do with our election, I want to know about it.


Trump says he "doesn't know" if it's an FBI investigation or not

lying? saying he didn't know if there is an FBI investigation or not, then kindof changing his story


Trump sounds like he's lying when he says he supports the investigation


Basically getting out of him is he is saying he wants the investigation done quickly so it will clear him


------


	HOLT: Well, there's already -- there's already intelligence from virtually every intelligence agency that yes, that happened (ph).

	TRUMP: I'll tell you this. If Russia or anybody else is trying to interfere with our elections, I think it's a horrible thing and I want to get to the bottom of it. And I want to make sure it will never, ever happen.

	HOLT: Were you angry with James Comey when he went public and said he can't support your unsubstantiated charges of wiretapping -- that your -- your predecessor wire tapped you?

	TRUMP: I was surprised he said it, but I wasn't angry. There's a big thing going on right now which is spying. And it's -- you can scroll to anything you want.


Trump lying? he is always fighitng the intel community


Does Trump honestly believe deep state Obama operatives are out to get him? seems like it



------


https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/05/11/president_trumps_full_interview_with_lester_holt.html


	HOLT: And what about when he went public and said that there was in fact an FBI investigation looking at your campaign and Russia? Did that anger you?

	I -- I ask that because...

	TRUMP: Well, I -- I -- you know I have that...

	HOLT: ...there's a -- a sense that you...

	TRUMP: ...I have that...

	HOLT: ...that there was a building anger.

	TRUMP: No, no, no. I -- I know every once in a while, you'll see that in the newspaper, anger somebody will report or they'll have false sources that maybe don't exist because of the media -- the way the media is. No.

	I will tell you, I think that -- I want very simply a great FBI director.


is Trump lying?


March 20 2017:



https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/843772976151642112
	James Clapper and others stated that there is no evidence Potus colluded with Russia. This story is FAKE NEWS and everyone knows it!

	3:35 AM - 20 Mar 2017


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/843776582825267201
	The Democrats made up and pushed the Russian story as an excuse for running a terrible campaign. Big advantage in Electoral College & lost!

	3:49 AM - 20 Mar 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/843779892776964097
	[reply to Claper tweet]

	The real story that Congress, the FBI and all others should be looking into is the leaking of Classified information. Must find leaker now!

	4:02 AM - 20 Mar 2017

https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/843813078076719107
	What about all of the contact with the Clinton campaign and the Russians? Also, is it true that the DNC would not let the FBI in to look?	

	6:14 AM - 20 Mar 2017


...


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/844886082663698436
	Just watched the totally biased and fake news reports of the so-called Russia story on NBC and ABC. Such dishonesty!
	5:18 AM - 23 Mar 2017 


...


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/846533818811080704
	Why isn't the House Intelligence Committee looking into the Bill & Hillary deal that allowed big Uranium to go to Russia, Russian speech....
	6:26 PM - 27 Mar 2017


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/846536212362018816
	...money to Bill, the Hillary Russian "reset," praise of Russia by Hillary, or Podesta Russian Company. Trump Russia story is a hoax. #MAGA!



Seems to want the Russia investigation diverted from him?


Is he lying? he said before that Russia "probably" intervened in election


Seems to take issue with collusion

Is possible his campaign colluded and he doesn't know

also possible he does


...


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/847766558520856578
	Mike Flynn should ask for immunity in that this is a witch hunt (excuse for big election loss), by media & Dems, of historic proportion!
	4:04 AM - 31 Mar 2017 


...


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/848153860602507264
	When will Sleepy Eyes Chuck Todd and @NBCNews start talking about the Obama SURVEILLANCE SCANDAL and stop with the Fake Trump/Russia story?
	5:43 AM - 1 Apr 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/848158641056362496
	It is the same Fake News Media that said there is "no path to victory for Trump" that is now pushing the phony Russia story. A total scam!
	6:02 AM - 1 Apr 2017 





interesting ... on April 1st:


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/848216035153121285
	Wow, @FoxNews just reporting big news. Source: "Official behind unmasking is high up. Known Intel official is responsible. Some unmasked....


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/848219027659010051
	..not associated with Russia. Trump team spied on before he was nominated." If this is true, does not get much bigger. Would be sad for U.S.

	10:02 AM - 1 Apr 2017



------


what was he saying up until firing him?


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/859209801175269376
	President Andrew Jackson, who died 16 years before the Civil War started, saw it coming and was angry. Would never have let it happen!
	5:55 PM - 1 May 2017 


what


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/859601184285491201
	FBI Director Comey was the best thing that ever happened to Hillary Clinton in that he gave her a free pass for many bad deeds! The phony...
	7:51 PM - 2 May 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/859604996236742656
	...Trump/Russia story was an excuse used by the Democrats as justification for losing the election. Perhaps Trump just ran a great campaign?
	8:06 PM - 2 May 2017


(explanation? Clinton blames Comey for her loss earlier: http://www.politico.com/story/2017/05/02/trump-clinton-comey-best-thing-that-ever-happened-237911)


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/860081707315232771
	Susan Rice, the former National Security Advisor to President Obama, is refusing to testify before a Senate Subcommittee next week on.....
	3:40 AM - 4 May 2017 

https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/860083874893897728
	...allegations of unmasking Trump transition officials. Not good!
	3:49 AM - 4 May 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/861712617299210240
	Director Clapper reiterated what everybody, including the fake media already knows- there is "no evidence" of collusion w/ Russia and Trump.
	3:41 PM - 8 May 2017


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/861713823505494016
	The Russia-Trump collusion story is a total hoax, when will this taxpayer funded charade end?
	3:46 PM - 8 May 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/861715019674910721
	Biggest story today between Clapper & Yates is on surveillance. Why doesn't the media report on this? #FakeNews!
	3:50 PM - 8 May 2017 


...


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/862135824745467905
	Cryin' Chuck Schumer stated recently, "I do not have confidence in him (James Comey) any longer." Then acts so indignant.  #draintheswamp
	7:42 PM - 9 May 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/862263649821503489
	The Democrats have said some of the worst things about James Comey, including the fact that he should be fired, but now they play so sad!
	4:10 AM - 10 May 2017


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/862265729718128641
	James Comey will be replaced by someone who will do a far better job, bringing back the spirit and prestige of the FBI.
	4:19 AM - 10 May 2017


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/862267781336752128
	Comey lost the confidence of almost everyone in Washington, Republican and Democrat alike. When things calm down, they will be thanking me!
	4:27 AM - 10 May 2017 

...

https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/862282202188566529
	Watching Senator Richard Blumenthal speak of Comey is a joke. "Richie" devised one of the greatest military frauds in U.S. history. For....
	5:24 AM - 10 May 2017 

	years, as a pol in Connecticut, Blumenthal would talk of his great bravery and conquests in Vietnam - except he was never there. When....

	caught, he cried like a baby and begged for forgiveness...and now he is judge & jury. He should be the one who is investigated for his acts.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/862290442129461249
	The Roger Stone report on @CNN is false - Fake News. Have not spoken to Roger in a long time - had nothing to do with my decision.
	5:57 AM - 10 May 2017


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/332704-trump-cnn-report-that-roger-stone-recommended-firing-comey-fake-news
	CNN’s Gloria Borger reported Wednesday morning that Stone was among those who recommended Trump fire Comey.

	Stone is among the Trump associates being scrutinized by the FBI as part of its investigation into Russian election interference and links between members of Trump's campaign and Moscow.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/05/10/comey-firing-trump-russia-238192
	He had grown enraged by the Russia investigation, two advisers said, frustrated by his inability to control the mushrooming narrative around Russia. He repeatedly asked aides why the Russia investigation wouldn’t disappear and demanded they speak out for him. He would sometimes scream at television clips about the probe, one adviser said. 


I can believe it

	But the fallout seemed to take the White House by surprise. Trump made a round of calls around 5 p.m., asking for support from senators. White House officials believed it would be a “win-win” because Republicans and Democrats alike had had problems with the FBI director, one person briefed on the administration’s deliberations said. 


a set-up? reminds me of Yaun Shikai declaring himself emperor kindof

just do something completely stupid and destroy yourself

	...On Twitter, Stone signaled praise for the move by posting an image of Trump from “The Apprentice” saying, “You’re fired.”

	Stone declined to comment Tuesday night but said he was enjoying a fine cigar. 


hmmm


-----

https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/863007411132649473
	James Comey better hope that there are no "tapes" of our conversations before he starts leaking to the press!
	5:26 AM - 12 May 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/863014620516233216
	When James Clapper himself, and virtually everyone else with knowledge of the witch hunt, says there is no collusion, when does it end?
	5:54 AM - 12 May 2017 



So basically it sounds like Trump thinks Comey is undermining him, out to get him, that sort of thing



after the tweet about the Russia leak story:


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/864452996129853444
	I have been asking Director Comey & others, from the beginning of my administration, to find the LEAKERS in the intelligence community.....
	5:10 AM - 16 May 2017 


thinks he's the leaker?


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/869865463584620544
	So now it is reported that the Democrats, who have excoriated Carter Page about Russia, don't want him to testify. He blows away their....
	3:37 AM - 31 May 2017


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/869867413776601088
	...case against him & now wants to clear his name by showing "the false or misleading testimony by James Comey, John Brennan..." Witch Hunt!
	3:45 AM - 31 May 2017 


does sound like he thinks Comey is out to get him. And Trump kept bringing up leaks in his convos with Comey.


So Trump paranoid (like Nixon!), thinks  conspiracy in USIC of "leakers" out to get him, undermine him, Russia story is "fake news" witchhunt, and he thinks Comey is in on it

says he knows/suspects firing Comey will "lengthen" the Russia investigation, claims he really wants it to be happen quicker, and that his reason for firing Comey was that Comey did a bad job of leading FBI


real reason to fire could be that Trump just thinks Comey is out to get him (which is true!)


Trump also seems to be very cognizant/sensitive of the Russia investigation, especially the dirty dossier.

So, is Comey right that Trump fired him because of the Russia investigation?

maybe, more like, Trump fired him because of how Trump thought Comey would handle the Russia investigation

Still has a good alibi for firing Comey for the email investigation in any case


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/872059997429022722
	The FAKE MSM is working so hard trying to get me not to use Social Media. They hate that I can get the honest and unfiltered message out.


If you say so...


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/873879934040780801
	I believe the James Comey leaks will be far more prevalent than anyone ever thought possible. Totally illegal? Very 'cowardly!'
	5:29 AM - 11 Jun 2017 


James Comey will leak more than you could possibly imagine


-----


So, if Trump is paranoid and fires Comey because he thinks Comey is out to get him (with the Russia investigation? others?), then fires Comey because of that and lies about it, but it turns out he was right all along...


is that legal?


(...is that even true?)


if he honestly thinks the Russia investigation is fake/news or played up, can that be obstruction of justice?


on the other hand, if he thinks there's something fishy in his tax returns...


but if he honestly thinks Comey is a crazy nutjob out to get him, firing doesn't seem like obstruction of justice. Trump says: I know it will lengthen investigation, want to shorten it



-----

Trump definitely suspects intel community of leaking against him:


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/01/11/us/politics/trump-press-conference-transcript.html
	JAN. 11, 2017

	TRUMP: All right, but you know what, it could have been others also.

	QUESTION: But why did you spend weeks undermining U.S. intelligence community before simply getting the facts and then making a public statement?

	TRUMP: Well, I think it’s pretty sad when intelligence reports get leaked out to the press. I think it’s pretty sad. First of all, it’s illegal. You know, these are — these are classified and certified meetings and reports.

	I’ll tell you what does happen. I have many meetings with intelligence. And every time I meet, people are reading about it. Somebody’s leaking it out. So, there’s — maybe it’s my office. Maybe in my office because I have a lot of people, a lot of great people. Maybe it’s them. And what I did is I said I won’t tell anybody. I’m going to have a meeting and I won’t tell anybody about my meeting with intelligence.

	And what happened is I had my meeting. Nobody knew, not even Rhona, my executive assistant for years, she didn’t know — I didn’t tell her. Nobody knew. The meeting was had, the meeting was over, they left. And immediately the word got out that I had a meeting.

	So, I don’t want that — I don’t want that. It’s very unfair to the country. It’s very unfair to our country; what’s happened. That report should have never — first of all, it shouldn’t have been printed because it’s not worth the paper it’s written on. And I thank the New York Times for saying that.

	I thank a lot of different people for saying that. But, I will tell you, that should never, ever happen. OK.


perhaps not as dumb as commonly believed either.

Isn't this from an episode of game of thrones or something?


also trump is *really* paranoid


------


http://video.foxnews.com/v/5325771485001/?#sp=show-clips
	Trump: Intel leaks will stop as we get our people in place

	Feb. 16, 2017 

a sign he blames the previous administration, with Comey being the last holdover


------


https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/05/11/president_trumps_full_interview_with_lester_holt.html
	HOLT: And will you expect if they would -- they would continue on with this investigation...

	TRUMP: Oh, yeah, sure. I expect that.


Does he? maybe would expect investigation to be finished qickly find no wrongdoing


------


	HOLT: General Flynn is a part of this investigation as you know. Sally Yates recently testified that the White House was notified that he had been compromised, he was at risk of...

	TRUMP: Yeah.

	HOLT: ...of being blackmailed. It was 18 days later that he was finally fired.

	During that 18 days, he had access, I assume, to all the nation's top secrets. One day you meet on the issue of Comey...

	TRUMP: Right.

	HOLT: ...and you fire him in a humiliating way, while he's sitting in a room with his colleagues and it's appearing on the TV.

	TRUMP: Because my White House counsel Don McGahn came back to me and did not sound like an emergency of any -- he didn't make it sound like he was, you know -- and she actually didn't make it sound that way, either in the hearings the other day. Like it had to be done immediately.


A lie? Yates did make it sound that way in the hearings.


What did McGahn say to Trump?


------

	...This man has served for many years. He's a general. He's a, in my opinion, a very good person.

	I believe that it would be very unfair to hear from somebody who we don't even know and immediately run out and fire a general. Now...

	HOLT: The acting Attorney General at the time.

	TRUMP: My White House counsel came to me. They had, I believe, two meetings. And we ultimately fired -- but we fired for a different reason.

	HOLT: You're talking about General Flynn?

	TRUMP: General Flynn, yes.

	HOLT: Because -- because of lying to the vice president.


"we ultimate fired him for a different reason" different than what? blackmail?


	TRUMP: Yeah, but everything plays in -- everything plays into it. But we fired him because he said something to the vice president that was not so.


I guess he gets that?


also "very unfair to hear from somebody we don't even know and immediately run out and fire a general."

Did Trump think Yates wanted him to fire Flynn? either way sounds like he didn't take her warning seriously.


Probably because he's sexist lol


	HOLT: Did you know that he had had -- that received payments from the Russian government? That he had...

	TRUMP: No.

	HOLT: ...received payments from the Turkish government?

	TRUMP: No, but Obama perhaps knew because he had clearance from the Obama administration. And his -- and -- and this is something they never want to report.

	He had clearance from the Obama administration, the highest clearance you can have. And I think it's a very unfair thing that the media doesn't talk about that.

	You know, you're talking about 2015. I don't know that I knew him in 2015.


Trump blames Obama of course

Blame Obama for setting him up?


------


	HOLT: The Senate Intelligence Committee wants information from the Treasury Department's financial crimes unit about your finances, your -- your businesses' finance.

	TRUMP: Yeah.

	HOLT: Can you tell us whether you, your family, your businesses, your surrogates have accepted any investments, any loans from Russians individuals...

	TRUMP: Yeah, in fact I just sent a letter...

	HOLT: ...or institutions?

	TRUMPS: ...to Lindsay Graham from one of the most prestigious law firms in the country -- a tremendous, highly rated law firm -- that I have nothing to do with Russia. I have no investments in Russia, none whatsoever.

	I don't have property in Russia -- a lot of people thought I owned office buildings in Moscow. I don't have property in Russia. And I am in very -- I -- I mean I -- I'm in total compliance in every way.


Doesn't his org have investiments in Russia? Trump Jr. said so


------

	I built a great company, but I'm not involved with Russia


hmmm



	I have had dealings over the years where I sold a house to a very wealthy Russian many years ago.

	I had the Miss Universe pageant, which I owned for quite a while. I had it in Moscow a long time ago.

	But other than that, I have nothing to do with Russia.


Tax lawyers say otherwise



------


	Now, this is a public meeting. Because, you know, when you cover this, the people watching may say oh, he met with Lavrov.

	Well, this was announced that I'm meeting with Lavrov. Just like a number of days ago, I spoke -- had a very good conversation -- very public in the sense that everybody knew this was taking place.


	...But when I spoke with Putin, he asked me whether or not I would see Lavrov. Now, what do I -- should I say no, I'm not going to see him? I said, I will see him.

	During that discussion with Lavrov, I think we had a great discussion having to do with Syria, having to do with the Ukraine. And maybe, that discussion will lead to a lot less people getting killed and will lead ultimately to peace.


Is that how Trump sees it?


no different from Obama


wants to make "friends" and have "peace" with people who are already trying to kill us


------


http://www.cnn.com/2017/05/12/politics/trump-comey-russia-thing/index.html
	• On Tuesday, the White House said Trump had fired Comey solely on the recommendation of the deputy attorney general, who sharply criticized the handling of the investigation into Hillary Clinton's use of a private email server as secretary of state.

	• That explanation was repeated multiple times on Wednesday by Vice President Mike Pence, senior adviser Kellyanne Conway and other White House officials. "He provided strong leadership ... to act on the recommendation of the deputy attorney general," Pence told reporters on Capitol Hill.

	• But late on Wednesday -- after earlier meeting Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and US ambassador Sergey Kislyak -- Trump said he had fired Comey "because he wasn't doing a good job." 

aren't those basically the same?


	Separately, the acting FBI director Andrew McCabe denied Trump's suggestion that Comey had lost the support of rank-and-file employees at the bureau. McCabe told a Senate hearing Thursday that Comey enjoyed "broad support" at the FBI.

interesting, although news some news reports (fox news) back up Trump


	But Trump's admission that the Russia investigation was on his mind when he fired Comey prompted suggestions that he could be accused of obstructing justice. 

	"If the President's real reason for firing Comey was to derail or obstruct the FBI investigation into possible collusion between the Russians and Trump associates to influence the outcome of the presidential election, this could warrant serious legal consequences," wrote Jimmy Gurulé, a law professor at Notre Dame and a former under secretary for enforcement at the US Department of the Treasury, in an article for CNN.


consciousness of guilt? except the President doesn't think he's guilty? basically he was saying he knows the optics are bad

	Adam Schiff, the top Democrat on the House Intelligence Committee told CNN, "I think that the firing was all about the Russia investigation."

	"He fired the top cop on that investigation, and I think no one believes this was about Hillary Clinton's emails. I think it was all about the Russia case," he added.



https://www.nytimes.com/2017/05/11/us/politics/trump-comey-showboat-fbi.html
	Mr. Trump said on Thursday that he had not relied solely on the advice from the Justice Department’s top two leaders in making his decision. And, for the first time, he explicitly referenced the F.B.I.’s investigation into his administration’s ties to Russia in defending Mr. Comey’s firing.


shit reporting


Trump even said earlier he thought Comey gave Hillary a pass, Rosenstein I guess confirmed what he thought


------


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/819164172781060096
	Intelligence agencies should never have allowed this fake news to "leak" into the public. One last shot at me.Are we living in Nazi Germany?

	4:48 AM - 11 Jan 2017


Trump actually thinks intelligence agencies leaked the dossier?


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/837993273679560704
	Is it legal for a sitting President to be "wire tapping" a race for president prior to an election? Turned down by court earlier. A NEW LOW!


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/314436-trump-on-outgoing-cia-director-was-this-the-leaker-of-fake-news
	Trump on outgoing CIA director: ‘Was this the leaker of Fake News?’


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/03/20/full-transcript-fbi-director-james-comey-testifies-on-russian-interference-in-2016-election/
	KING: ...yourself, Admiral Rogers, Director Brennan, and General Clapper went to Trump tower to meet with President Trump. The media reports are that at the end of that meeting, Director Comey, you presented president-elect Trump with a copy of the now infamous or famous dossier. And I don't know how many people were in the room, but within hours, that was leaked to the media and that gave the media the excuse or the rationale to publish almost the entire dossier.

	Do you -- does that violate any law? I mean you were at a classified briefing with the president-elect of the United States and it had to be a very, very small universe of people who knew that you handed them that dossier and it was leaked out within hours. Are you making any effort to find out who leaked it and do you believe that constitute a criminal violation?

	COMEY: I can't say, Mr. King except I can answer in general.



------


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-election-fbi-leaks-idUSKBN12Y2QD
	FBI fear of leaks drove decision on emails linked to Clinton: sources

 	FBI Director James Comey was driven in part by a fear of leaks from within his agency when he decided to tell Congress the FBI was investigating newly discovered emails related to Hillary Clinton, law enforcement sources said on Thursday.





intresting that Comey himself fears leaks--adding to the "Comey a hypocrite/double-standard" takedown I presume they are planning?


------

http://heavy.com/news/2017/02/white-house-leaks-trump-nsa-cia-intelligence-community-shadow-war-fbi-john-schindler-robin-townley-michael-flynn-russia-twitter/


    Information is being illegally given to the failing @nytimes & @washingtonpost by the intelligence community (NSA and FBI?).Just like Russia

    — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) February 15, 2017

    The real scandal here is that classified information is illegally given out by "intelligence" like candy. Very un-American!

    — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) February 15, 2017

    Thank you to Eli Lake of The Bloomberg View – "The NSA & FBI…should not interfere in our politics…and is" Very serious situation for USA

    — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) February 15, 2017



------


https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/06/08/trumps_lawyer_marc_kasowitz_press_conference_responds_to_james_comey_hearing.html
 	Mr Comey's testimony also makes clear that the President never sought to impede the investigation into attempted Russian interference in the 2016 election, and in fact, according to Mr. Comey, the President told Mr. Comey "it would be good to find out" in that investigation if there were "some 'satellite' associates of his who did something wrong." And he did not exclude anyone from that statement.


I mean that's true but that doesn't exonerate him...


a shit lawyer on purpose?


	Consistent with that statement, the President never, in form or substance, directed or suggested that Mr. Comey stop investigating anyone, including suggesting that that Mr. Comey "let Flynn go." As he publicly stated the next day, he did say to Mr. Comey, "General Flynn is a good guy, he has been through a lot," and also "asked how is General Flynn is doing." Admiral Rogers testified that the President never "directed to do anything . . . illegal, immoral, unethical or inappropriate" and never "pressured to do so." Director Coates said the same thing. The President likewise never pressured Mr. Comey.


yeah that makes no sense it's not like you can extrapolate between completely different people


	The President also never told Mr. Comey, "I need loyalty, I expect loyalty" in form or substance. Of course, the Office of the President is entitled to expect loyalty from those who are serving in an administration, and, from before this President took office to this day, it is overwhelmingly clear that there have been and continue to be those in government who are actively attempting to undermine this administration with selective and illegal leaks of classified information and privileged communications. Mr. Comey has now admitted that he is one of these leakers.


saying Comey lied under oath? a problem


	Today, Mr. Comey admitted that he unilaterally and surreptitiously made unauthorized disclosures to the press of privileged communications with the President. The leaks of this privileged information began no later than March 2017 when friends of Mr. Comey have stated he disclosed to them the conversations he had with the President during their January 27, 2017 dinner and February 14, 2017 White House meeting. Today, Mr. Comey admitted that he leaked to friends his purported memos of these privileged conversations, one of which he testified was classified. He also testified that immediately after he was terminated he authorized his friends to leak the contents of these memos to the press in order to "prompt the appointment of a special counsel." Although Mr. Comey testified he only leaked the memos in response to a tweet, the public record reveals that the New York Times was quoting from these memos the day before the referenced tweet, which belies Mr. Comey's excuse for this unauthorized disclosure of privileged information and appears to entirely retaliatory. We will leave it the appropriate authorities to determine whether this leaks should be investigated along with all those others being investigated.


don't see how that helps his case?

Lawyer sounds like he's saying things he knows Trump will like to hear and sound good but will actually fuck him over


the whole 2016 and past year could be a movie

"Mr. Trumps bad day"

for 365 days


 	In sum, it is now established that the President was not being investigated for colluding with the Russians or attempting to obstruct that investigation. As the Committee pointed out today, these important facts for the country to know are virtually the only facts that have not leaked during the long course of these events.


yeah just saying what trump wants to hear

	As he said yesterday, the President feels completely vindicated and is eager to continue moving forward with his agenda with this public cloud removed.

	Thank you.


oh Trump wants to move foward with this agenda?


what if we have another agenda


like


CHAOS


------

http://chicago.suntimes.com/news/transcript-president-trump-colombian-president-santos-presser/
	Transcript: President Trump, Colombian President Santos presser
	Chicago News 05/18/2017,

	Today, I affirmed the United States’ willingness to assist Colombia’s strategy to target and eliminate drug trafficking networks, illicit financings, coca cultivation, and cocaine production, of which there is far too much.  The drug epidemic is poisoning too many American lives, and we’re going to stop it many different ways.  One of them will be the wall.


what a fucking asshole

	Today, we live in a different country.  Today, Colombia is a more peaceful society, a more modern and a fairer society.  In November last year, we ended the longest and last armed conflict existing in our hemisphere.  The guerilla is putting down weapons at this precise time to the United Nations.  Insecurity has gone down significantly.  Today, we have the lowest levels of violence of the last 40 years.

go santos

already rooting for him over the orange peice of shit we have for POTUS


	Q    Mr. President, I’d like to get your reaction to Deputy Attorney General Rod Rosenstein’s decision to appoint a special counsel to investigate the Russian interference in the campaign.  Was this the right move, or is this part of a “witch hunt”?

	PRESIDENT TRUMP:  Well, I respect the move, but the entire thing has been a witch hunt.  And there is no collusion between certainly myself and my campaign, but I can always speak for myself — and the Russians, zero.

...

	That’s what I want to be focused on.  Because, believe me, there’s no collusion.  Russia is fine.  But whether it’s Russia or anybody else, my total priority, believe me, is the United States of America.


why does he always insert "or anyone else?"

nobody's calling him a Columbian stooge, that's for sure


	Q    Thank you, Mr. President.  In the light of a very busy news week, a lot of people would like to get to the bottom of a couple of things, give you a chance to go on record here.  Did you at any time urge former FBI Director James Comey in any way, shape, or form to close or to back down the investigation into Michael Flynn?

	And also as you look back —

	PRESIDENT TRUMP:  No.  No.  Next question.

	...

	Q    Next question.  As you look back over the past six months or year, have you had any recollection where you’ve wondered if anything you have done has been something that might be worthy of criminal charges in these investigations or impeachment, as some on the left are implying?

	PRESIDENT TRUMP:  I think it’s totally ridiculous.  Everybody thinks so.  And again, we have to get back to working our country properly so that we can take care of the problems that we have.  We have plenty of problems.  We’ve done a fantastic job.  We have a tremendous group of people.  Millions and millions of people out there that are looking at what you had just said, and said, “What are they doing?”

	Director Comey was very unpopular with most people.  I actually thought when I made that decision — and I also got a very, very strong recommendation, as you know, from the Deputy Attorney General, Rod Rosenstein.  But when I made that decision, I actually thought that it would be a bipartisan decision, because you look at all of the people on the Democratic side — not only the Republican side — they were saying such terrible things about Director Comey.


Brings up the reccommendation as part of his decision again

also adding "Comey was unpopular with both sides"

"saying such terrible things"


	Then he had the very poor performance on Wednesday.  That was a poor, poor performance.  So poor, in fact, that I believe — and you’d have to ask him, because I don’t like to speak for other people — but I believe that’s why the Deputy Attorney General went out and wrote his very, very strong letter.


??? which Wednesday?

the 10th?

what was he even doing the 10th


But Trump changing his story on why Rosenstein wrote the letter again


	And then, on top of that, after the Wednesday performance by Director Comey, you had a person come and have to readjust the record, which many people have never seen before, because there were misstatements made.  And I thought that was something that was terrible.


Ok he means May the 3rd, duh


	We need a great director of the FBI.  I cherish the FBI.  It’s special.  All over the world, no matter where you go, the FBI is special.  The FBI has not had that special reputation with what happened in the campaign, what happened with respect to the Clinton campaign, and even you could say — directly or indirectly — with respect to the much more successful Trump campaign.

	We’re going to have a director who is going to be outstanding.  I’ll be announcing that director very soon, and I look forward to doing it.  I think the people in the FBI will be very, very thrilled.


Trump think he can hire a new FBI director and it all blows over?

depends on the hire anyway, how independent he/she seems at least


	And just in concluding, we look forward to getting this whole situation behind us so that when we go for the jobs, we go for the strong military, when we go for all of the things that we’ve been pushing so hard and so successfully, including healthcare — because Obamacare is collapsing.  It’s dead; it’s gone.  There’s nothing to compare anything to because we don’t have healthcare in this country.  You just look at what’s happening.  Aetna just pulled out.  Other insurance companies are pulling out.  We don’t have healthcare.  Obamacare is a fallacy.  It’s gone.  We need healthcare.


like wanting the cloud to be lifted? Trump seems to really want the whole thing to blow over

would speak to intent to kill the investigation though

but he might have figured "getting out" that he's not under investigation would lift "the cloud"

except now he's officially under investigation


	We need to cut taxes.  We’re going to cut taxes.  Forget what I want; it will be the biggest tax cut in the history of our nation.  And that’s what I want.  It’s going to bring back companies.  It’s going to bring back jobs.  We lost so many jobs and so many companies to countries that are not so far from you, Mr. President — they’re very close to you, actually — and to many other places throughout the world.  We’re going to change that.  We’re going to have expansion.

	We already do.  You look at what’s happening with Ford and with General Motors in Michigan and Ohio.  You look at the tremendous number of jobs that are being announced in so many different fields.  That’s what I’m proud of, and that’s what we want to focus our energy on.

	The other is something I can only tell you:  There was no collusion.  And everybody — even my enemies have said, there is no collusion.

	So we want to get back and keep on the track that we’re on.  Because the track that we’re on is record-setting, and that’s what we want to do, is we want to break very positive records.

	Thank you.


------

https://www.whitehouse.gov/the-press-office/2017/05/09/statement-press-secretary-1
	 Today, President Donald J. Trump informed FBI Director James Comey that he has been terminated and removed from office.  President Trump acted based on the clear recommendations of both Deputy Attorney General Rod Rosenstein and Attorney General Jeff Sessions.

	“The FBI is one of our Nation’s most cherished and respected institutions and today will mark a new beginning for our crown jewel of law enforcement,” said President Trump.

	A search for a new permanent FBI Director will begin immediately.


so spicer "acted based on" resenstein and sessions recommendation


------


http://www.politifact.com/truth-o-meter/article/2017/may/12/fact-checking-donald-trumps-nbc-interview-claims-a/

	"I have no investments in Russia, none whatsoever."

	Lawyers for Trump released a letter May 12 saying Trump does not have any income, debt or investments related to Russia, with a couple exceptions: Trump hosted the Miss Universe pageant in Moscow in 2013, a $20 million deal facilitated by Russian real estate mogul and billionaire Aras Agalarov. He also made millions selling a 17-bedroom Florida mansion to a Russian billionaire.

	We can't independently examine the extent of Trump’s business dealings in Russia, in part because he hasn’t released his tax returns. But journalists have pulled together examples of Trump seeking out business opportunities in Russia or with Russian buyers throughout his career.

	Notably, Trump's son, Donald Trump Jr., said in a 2008 real estate conference that "Russians make up a pretty disproportionate cross-section of a lot of our assets."

	"This is a public meeting," regarding his May 10 Oval Office meeting with Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and Russian Ambassador Sergey Kislyak.

	This was a private White House meeting, closed to the American press. We only have photos of the event from Tass, a Russian government-run news agency, and the official White House photographer.


why does he lie so much


did he honestly think firing COmey would stop the leaks?


he turned them up to 11



------


Trump decided to fire Comey upon a "very strong recommendation" from Rosenstein and the Attorney General, but also was going to fire him anyway. Trump is aware of the bad-optics of firing Comey [1][8] due to the Russia investigation, but Trump figured the whole Russia story is just a made-up excuse by sour Democrats [2]. Trump realized that firing Comey might make the Russia investigation take longer, but he had to do the right thing for the American people [7]. Besides, the investigation was just an excuse that should have been over with a long time ago [8], and he wanted the investigation to be sped-up anyway [9].

Other than the DOJ's recommendation, Trump has a long list of reason to fire Comey. For one, Comey is a show-boater and grandstander [3] who had put the FBI in turmoil [4] and bruised public trust in the FBI [36]. Comey did a poor job at the May 3rd Senate Intelligence Committee Hearing, and this is probably why the DOJ wrote their letter [10]. Comey made misstatements during this testimony which the FBI had to correct, which rarely happens [34]. Trump cherishes the FBI and understands they are very special, but because of what happened to the Clinton campaign (and even to Trump's much more successful campaign), the FBI lost that special reputation during the 2016 election [11]. When Trump fired him, Comey was very unpopular, and both Democrats and Republicans were saying terrible things about him [33]. On top of that, Comey is an Obama appointee, and is not Trump's man [5]. In the end, Trump wants someone who's capable and can be a great FBI director, and that's just not Comey [6]. He's the wrong man for that position, and the wrong man for the American people [12]. 

Trump wants the Russia investigation to be absolutely done properly [13]. Neither Trump nor anybody else from the White House asked Comey to drop the Russia investigation [14], and Trump doesn't know of any surrogates who asked on behalf of the White House [15]. Trump wants the investigation to be good and strong, so we can get to the bottom of this [16], but he maintains that the Russia investigation was a set-up by the Democrats [17]. Trump says there is no collusion between his campaign and the Russians, and the Russians did not affect the vote [18]. Besides the Miss Universe pageant in Moscow and selling a home to a wealthy Russian, Trump himself has nothing to do with Russia [18].

Trump did not urge Comey in any way to back down the investigation into Micheal Flynn [19]. Trump was aware of Yate's warning about Flynn, but he didn't think it was that big of a deal. Trump says the White House Counsel, Don McGahn, didn't make the problems with Flynn sound like any kind of emergency or anything urgent, and neither did Yates in her Congressional hearing [24]. Trump thought it would be unfair to immediately fire Flynn, a General and a good person, after hearing from somebody he doesn't even know [25]. But ultimately, Trump fired Flynn because he lied to the Vice President [26].

Trump was surprised when Comey publicly declared there was no evidence for his wiretapping claims, but he wasn't angry [22]. Nor was Trump angry when Comey revealed the FBI was investigating his campaign for colluding with Russia. In fact, newspaper stories saying Trump was angry might have used false sources, or even sources that don't exist [23].

Trump never thought about the optics of firing Comey the day before meeting with Lavrov, because creating jobs, strength, security, and strong borders are more important than optics [29]. The meeting was a public meeting, and very public since Trump announced it and everybody knew about it [30]. Putin asked Trump to set up the meeting [31].


0. http://www.cnn.com/2017/05/09/politics/fbi-james-comey-fired-letter/index.html
	Dear Director Comey

	I have received the attached letters from the Attorney General and Deputy Attorney General of the United States recommending your dismissal as the Director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. I have accepted their recommendation and you are hereby terminated and removed from office effective immediately.



1. "there was no good time to do it"

2. " And in fact, when I decided to just do it, I said to myself -- I said, you know, this Russia thing with Trump and Russia is a made-up story. It's an excuse by the Democrats for having lost an election that they should've won."

3. TRUMP: Look, he's a showboat. He's a grandstander.

	...I also want to have a really competent, capable director. He's not. He's a show boater.

4.
The FBI has been in turmoil. You know that, I know that, everybody knows that.

You take a look at the FBI a year ago, it was in virtual turmoil -- less than a year ago. It hasn't recovered from that.





https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/05/11/president_trumps_full_interview_with_lester_holt.html

5. "He's not my man or not my man. I didn't appoint him. He was appointed long before me."


6. "I will tell you, I think that -- I want very simply a great FBI director."

7.  ...But I said to myself I might even lengthen out the investigation. But I have to do the right thing for the American people.

8. When I did this now, I said I probably maybe will confuse people. Maybe I'll expand that -- you know, I'll lengthen the time because it should be over with. It should -- in my opinion, should've been over with a long time ago because it -- all it is an excuse. 	

9.  TRUMP: No. In fact, I want the investigation speeded up...


10. Then he had the very poor performance on Wednesday.  That was a poor, poor performance.  So poor, in fact, that I believe — and you’d have to ask him, because I don’t like to speak for other people — but I believe that’s why the Deputy Attorney General went out and wrote his very, very strong letter.



http://chicago.suntimes.com/news/transcript-president-trump-colombian-president-santos-presser/
11.  We need a great director of the FBI.  I cherish the FBI.  It’s special.  All over the world, no matter where you go, the FBI is special.  The FBI has not had that special reputation with what happened in the campaign, what happened with respect to the Clinton campaign, and even you could say — directly or indirectly — with respect to the much more successful Trump campaign.

12. ...But I said to myself I might even lengthen out the investigation. But I have to do the right thing for the American people.

	He's the wrong man for that position.

13. TRUMP: No, I don't care...

	HOLT: ...links between...

	TRUMP: Look -- look, let me tell you. As far as I'm concerned, I want that thing to be absolutely done properly.

14. HOLT: Did you ask him to drop the investigation?

	TRUMP: No, never.

	HOLT: Did anyone from the White House...

	TRUMP: No. In fact, I want the investigation speeded up...


15. HOLT: Any -- any surrogates on behalf of the White House?

	TRUMP: Not that I know of. Look, I want to find out if there was a problem with an election having to do with Russia. Or by the way any -- but -- any -- anybody else. Any other country.

	And I want that to be so strong and so good. And I want it to happen.



16. HOLT: But when you put out tweets it's a total hoax. It's a taxpayer charade. And you're looking for a new FBI director, are you not sending that person a message to lay off?

TRUMP: No, I'm not doing that. I think that we have to get back to work. But I want to find out -- I want to get to the bottom.


17.
 TRUMP: Oh, I think that looking into me and the campaign -- look, I have nothing to do -- this was set up by the Democrats.

18. There is no collusion between me and my campaign and the Russians.

	The other thing is the Russians did not affect the vote. And everybody seems to think that.

18. TRUMPS: ...to Lindsay Graham from one of the most prestigious law firms in the country -- a tremendous, highly rated law firm -- that I have nothing to do with Russia. I have no investments in Russia, none whatsoever.

	I don't have property in Russia -- a lot of people thought I owned office buildings in Moscow. I don't have property in Russia. And I am in very -- I -- I mean I -- I'm in total compliance in every way.

	Now, I have to tell you, I file documents -- hundreds of pages worth of documents with the Federal Elections Bureau. Everybody's seen that.

	I built a great company, but I'm not involved with Russia. I have had dealings over the years where I sold a house to a very wealthy Russian many years ago.

	I had the Miss Universe pageant, which I owned for quite a while. I had it in Moscow a long time ago.

	But other than that, I have nothing to do with Russia.


19.  Q    Thank you, Mr. President.  In the light of a very busy news week, a lot of people would like to get to the bottom of a couple of things, give you a chance to go on record here.  Did you at any time urge former FBI Director James Comey in any way, shape, or form to close or to back down the investigation into Michael Flynn?

	And also as you look back —

	PRESIDENT TRUMP:  No.  No.  Next question.


20. HOLT: You didn't take that as a sign that this loyalty that he came out and contradicted you?

(CROSSTALK)

TRUMP: No, I didn't -- I didn't -- I don't think of it as loyalty. I mean, I want whoever the director is, I want him to do the right thing.



http://www.foxnews.com/transcript/2017/05/12/hannity-trump-should-replace-wh-briefings-with-tweets.html
21. PIRRO: People suggest that the question that, apparently, The New York Times is selling, that you asked Comey whether or not you had his loyalty, was possibly inappropriate. Could you see how they would think that?

	TRUMP: No, I don't think -- I read that article. I don't think it's inappropriate, number one. It isn't--

	PIRRO: Did you ask that question?

	TRUMP: No. No, I didn't. But I don't think it would be a bad question to ask. I think loyalty to the country, loyalty to United States is important. You know, I mean, it depends on how you define loyalty, number one. And number two, I don't know how that got there because I didn't ask that question.

	PIRRO: What about the idea that in a tweet, you said that there might be tape recordings?

	TRUMP: Well, that I can't talk about. I won't talk about that. All I want is for Comey to be honest, and I hope he will be, and I'm sure he will be, I hope.

 

22. HOLT: Were you angry with James Comey when he went public and said he can't support your unsubstantiated charges of wiretapping -- that your -- your predecessor wire tapped you?

	TRUMP: I was surprised he said it, but I wasn't angry. There's a big thing going on right now which is spying. And it's -- you can scroll to anything you want.


23. HOLT: And what about when he went public and said that there was in fact an FBI investigation looking at your campaign and Russia? Did that anger you?

I -- I ask that because...

TRUMP: Well, I -- I -- you know I have that...

HOLT: ...there's a -- a sense that you...

TRUMP: ...I have that...

HOLT: ...that there was a building anger.

TRUMP: No, no, no. I -- I know every once in a while, you'll see that in the newspaper, anger somebody will report or they'll have false sources that maybe don't exist because of the media -- the way the media is. No.


24. HOLT: General Flynn is a part of this investigation as you know. Sally Yates recently testified that the White House was notified that he had been compromised, he was at risk of...

TRUMP: Yeah.

HOLT: ...of being blackmailed. It was 18 days later that he was finally fired.

During that 18 days, he had access, I assume, to all the nation's top secrets. One day you meet on the issue of Comey...

TRUMP: Right.

HOLT: ...and you fire him in a humiliating way, while he's sitting in a room with his colleagues and it's appearing on the TV.

TRUMP: Because my White House counsel Don McGahn came back to me and did not sound like an emergency of any -- he didn't make it sound like he was, you know -- and she actually didn't make it sound that way, either in the hearings the other day. Like it had to be done immediately.

This man has served for many years. He's a general. He's a, in my opinion, a very good person.


25. I believe that it would be very unfair to hear from somebody who we don't even know and immediately run out and fire a general. Now...

HOLT: The acting Attorney General at the time.


26. TRUMP: My White House counsel came to me. They had, I believe, two meetings. And we ultimately fired -- but we fired for a different reason.

HOLT: You're talking about General Flynn? TRUMP: General Flynn, yes.

TRUMP: Yeah, but everything plays in -- everything plays into it. But we fired him because he said something to the vice president that was not so.


27. TRUMP: I was surprised he said it, but I wasn't angry. There's a big thing going on right now which is spying. And it's -- you can scroll to anything you want.

The unmasking and the spying. And to me, that's the big story right now. That's a very, very big story.

http://chicago.suntimes.com/news/transcript-president-trump-colombian-president-santos-presser/
28. "a very, very strong recommendation"

29. HOLT: Did you worry at all when you made the decision to fire Comey when you did, the day before Lavrov was here in the White House and -- and the Russian Ambassador. Did you think through the optics of a way this would look?

TRUMP: I never thought about -- it was set up a while ago. And frankly, I could've waited. But what difference does it make?

I'm not looking for cosmetics. I'm looking to do a great job for the country.

30. Now, this is a public meeting. Because, you know, when you cover this, the people watching may say oh, he met with Lavrov.

Well, this was announced that I'm meeting with Lavrov. Just like a number of days ago, I spoke -- had a very good conversation -- very public in the sense that everybody knew this was taking place.

31.  But when I spoke with Putin, he asked me whether or not I would see Lavrov. Now, what do I -- should I say no, I'm not going to see him? I said, I will see him.


32. HOLT: Was it in a phone call? Did you meet face to face?

TRUMP: I had a dinner with him. He wanted to have dinner because he wanted to stay on. We had a very nice dinner at the White House...

HOLT: He -- he asked...

(CROSSTALK)

TRUMP: ...very early on. That dinner was arranged. I think he asked for the dinner.

And he wanted to stay on as the FBI head. And I said I'll, you know, consider. We'll see what happens.

But we had a very nice dinner. And at that time, he told you are not under investigation...


33.
http://chicago.suntimes.com/news/transcript-president-trump-colombian-president-santos-presser/
	Director Comey was very unpopular with most people.  I actually thought when I made that decision — and I also got a very, very strong recommendation, as you know, from the Deputy Attorney General, Rod Rosenstein.  But when I made that decision, I actually thought that it would be a bipartisan decision, because you look at all of the people on the Democratic side — not only the Republican side — they were saying such terrible things about Director Comey.


34.
http://chicago.suntimes.com/news/transcript-president-trump-colombian-president-santos-presser/
	And then, on top of that, after the Wednesday performance by Director Comey, you had a person come and have to readjust the record, which many people have never seen before, because there were misstatements made.  And I thought that was something that was terrible.


http://www.cnn.com/2017/05/09/politics/fbi-james-comey-fired-letter/index.html
35. It is essential that we find new leadership for the FBI that restores public trust and confidence in its vital law enforcement mission.




-------


http://www.latimes.com/politics/la-na-pol-trump-news-conference-transcript-20170216-story.html
	Feb 16, 2017

	The nice thing is, I see it starting to turn, where people are now looking at the illegal -- I think it's very important -- the illegal, giving out classified information. It was -- and let me just tell you, it was given out like so much.

	I'll give you an example. I called, as you know, Mexico. It was a very, very confidential, classified call. But I called Mexico. And in calling Mexico, I figured, oh, well that's -- I spoke to the president of Mexico; I had a good call. All of a sudden, it's out there for the world to see. It's supposed to be secret. It's supposed to be either confidential or classified, in that case.

	Same thing with Australia. All of a sudden, people are finding out exactly what took place. The same thing happened with respect to General Flynn. Everybody saw this. And I'm saying -- the first thing I thought of when I heard about it is: How does the press get this information that's classified? How do they do it?

	You know why? Because it's an illegal process and the press should be ashamed of themselves. But more importantly, the people that gave out the information to the press should be ashamed of themselves, really ashamed.


Trump clearly concerned about leaks "like so much"

	ON RUSSIAN GOVERNMENT TIES

	QUESTION: (inaudible) clarification here. During your campaign, did anyone from your team (inaudible) Russian government or Russian intelligence? And if so, what was the nature of those conversations (inaudible)?

	TRUMP: The failing New York Times wrote a big, long front-page story yesterday. And it was very much discredited, as you know. It was -- it's a joke. And the people mentioned in the story, I notice they were on television today saying they never even spoke to Russia. They weren't even a part, really -- I mean, they were such a minor part. They -- I hadn't spoken to them.

	I think the one person -- I don't think I've ever spoken to him. I don't think I've ever met him. And he actually said he was a very low-level member of I think a committee for a short period of time. I don't think I ever met him. Now, it's possible that I walked into a room and he was sitting there, but I don't think I ever met him. I didn't talk to him ever. And he thought it was a joke.


Is he talking about Page?

	The other person said he never spoke to Russia; never received a call. Look at his phone records, et cetera, et cetera. And the other person, people knew that he represented various countries, but I don't think he represented Russia, but knew that he represented various countries. That's what he does. I mean, people know that.

	That's Mr. Manafort, who's -- by the way, who's by the way a respected man. He's a respected man. But I think he represented the Ukraine or Ukraine government or somebody, but everybody -- people knew that. Everybody knew that.


kindof goes against the dossier claim--even Trump knows it


this the story?

https://www.nytimes.com/2017/02/14/us/politics/russia-intelligence-communications-trump.html

mentions page, Stone, and Manafort

seems like Trump doesn't talk about Stone?


https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/anyone--with-a-pulse-how-a-russia-friendly-adviser-found-his-way-into-the-trump-campaign/2017/05/25/32438f72-4014-11e7-8c25-44d09ff5a4a8_story.html
	Page was in. He joined a new Trump campaign national security advisory group, and in late March 2016, the candidate pointed to Page, among others, as evidence of a foreign policy team with gravitas.


So Page joined in March 2016, left in August 2016


	...The circumstances that led to Page’s easy access to the Trump campaign represent one of the main questions facing investigators: Were Trump’s connections to multiple Russia-friendly advisers mere coincidence, or evidence of a coordinated attempt to collude with a foreign government? Or were they the result of incompetent vetting that left a neophyte candidate vulnerable to influence from people with nefarious agendas?


bingo

	Multiple people familiar with campaign operations, most of whom spoke on the condition of anonymity to discuss internal deliberations, said that Page and others were brought into the fold at a time of desperation for the Trump team. As Trump was starting to win primaries, he was under increasing pressure to show that he had a legitimate, presidential-caliber national security team. The problem he faced was that most mainstream national security experts wanted nothing to do with him.

	“Everyone did their best, but there was not as much vetting as there could have been,” former campaign manager Corey Lewandowski said.

	Another longtime campaign official put it this way: “Anyone who came to us with a pulse, a résumé and seemed legit would be welcomed.”


I remember that in the media

	...Page and Trump aides have said that Page never met Trump, and Page left the campaign in August 2016. 


	...Papadopoulos could be seen at the table. Page was not there, and Trump officials have said that Trump never met Page during his five-month stint as an adviser.

	People involved with the campaign recall that Page attended other meetings that the group held in Washington, including one attended by Sessions. He also submitted policy memos for the campaign’s review, a former campaign adviser said.


	...The document, which was compiled by a former British spy employed by Trump’s political adversaries, became public after the election and was dismissed by Trump and his allies as “fake news.” Page vigorously rejects the allegation about him and said the FBI should spend its time investigating how the document came together instead of his activities.


lol

sounds right to me

Page there to make Trump look even more like a Russian stooge so they can blackmail him with his tax returns or something?


They know Trump will just lie and lie and lie and incriminate himself for no reason


------


http://www.latimes.com/politics/la-na-pol-trump-news-conference-transcript-20170216-story.html
	Russia is fake news. Russia -- this is fake news put out by the media. The real news is the fact that people, probably from the Obama administration because they're there, because we have our new people going in place, right now.

	As you know, Mike Pompeo has -- has now taken control of the CIA, James Comey at FBI, Dan Coats is waiting to be approved, I mean he is a senator and a highly respected one and he's still waiting to be approved. But our new people are going in.


Shows again blames Obama for the "Russia fake news," implies new people going in will stop the "Russia fake news"


	...But I will say that, I never get phone calls from the media. How did they write a story like that in The Wall Street Journal without asking me or how did they write a story in The New York Times, put it on front page?


who's fault is that, Hope Hicks?


	...As far as the general's concerned, when I first heard about it, I said huh, that doesn't sound wrong. My counsel came, Don McGahn, White House Counsel, and he told me and I asked him, he can speak very well for himself. He said he doesn't think anything is wrong, you know, really didn't think.

	The information was provided by -- who I don't know, Sally Yates. And I was a little surprised because I said "doesn't sound like he did anything wrong there." But he did something wrong with respect to the vice president and I thought that was not acceptable. As far as -- as far as the actual making the call, fact I've watched various programs and I've read various articles where he was just doing his job.


So sounds like Trump knew Flynn was under investigation/ "in trouble" with DOJ, but "didn't think he did anything wrong."


------

	QUESTION: I'm sorry. What will you do on the leaks? You've said twice today...

	TRUMP: ...Yes, we're looking at them very -- very, very serious. I've gone to all of the folks in charge of the various agencies and we're -- I've actually called the Justice Department to look into the leaks. Those are criminal leaks. They're put out by people either in agencies -- I think you'll see it stopping because now we have our people in. You know, again, we don't have our people in because we can't get them approved by the Senate.


again, thinks the leaks caused by Obama officials


	...TRUMP: All right. So, in one case, you're talking about highly classified information. In the other case, you're talking about John Podesta saying bad things about the boss. I will say this, if John Podesta said that about me and he was working for me, I would have fired him so fast your head would have spun.


Is that how Trump thinks? if you say something bad about the boss behind his back, fire him?

Does he apply that logic to the FBI director? Attorney General?


------


	TRUMP: You know what it is? Here's the thing. The public isn't -- you know, they read newspapers, they see television, they watch. They don't know if it's true or false because they're not involved. I'm involved. I've been involved with this stuff all my life. But I'm involved. So I know when you're telling the truth or when you're not. I just see many, many untruthful things.


Interesting, I wonder if they go out of their way to try to convince Trump the news is fake? something he'd know is fake to piss him off and get him to attack the media, and all his supporters to attack the media with him.  And he could correct the story but I guess Hope Hicks doesn't let him.


	...I watched this morning a couple of the networks. And I have to say, Fox & Friends in the morning, they're very honorable people. They're very -- not because they're good, because they hit me also when I do something wrong. But they have the most honest morning show. That's all I can say. It's the most honest.


loves Fox and Friends, evident on his twitter. A way to influence him?

	...TRUMP: Well, you look at your show that goes on at 10 o'clock in the evening. You just take a look at that show. That is a constant hit. The panel is almost always exclusive anti-Trump. The good news is he doesn't have good ratings. But the panel is almost exclusive anti-Trump. And the hatred and venom coming from his mouth; the hatred coming from other people on your network.

	Now, I will say this. I watch it. I see it. I'm amazed by it. And I just think you'd be a lot better off, I honestly do. The public gets it, you know. Look, when I go to rallies, they turn around, they start screaming at CNN. They want to throw their placards at CNN. You know.


Trump cares a lot about the media, "ratings," watches (who's?) this guys anti-Trump show. Makes it harder for him to argue he's unfamiliar with popular stories in the news.


	...Tomorrow, they will say, "Donald Trump rants and raves at the press." I'm not ranting and raving. I'm just telling you. You know, you're dishonest people. But -- but I'm not ranting and raving. I love this. I'm having a good time doing it.

	But tomorrow, the headlines are going to be, "Donald Trump rants and raves." I'm not ranting and raving.


he is ranting and raving. But seems that starting a fight between the press and Trump is something they wanted?

	QUESTION: When you call it "fake news," you're undermining confidence in our news media (inaudible) important.

	TRUMP: No, no. I do that. Here's the thing. OK. I understand what you're -- and you're right about that, except this. See, I know when I should get good and when I should get bad. And sometimes I'll say, "Wow, that's going to be a great story." And I'll get killed.

	I know what's good and bad. I'd be a pretty good reporter, not as good as you. But I know what's good. I know what's bad. And when they change it and make it really bad, something that should be positive -- sometimes something that should be very positive, they'll make OK. They'll even make it negative.


So what he understands he's undermining confidence in the press but does it anyway?

	...You know, I said to him yesterday this whole Russia scam that you guys are building so that you don't talk about the real subject which is illegal leaks, but I watched him yesterday working so hard to try and get that story proper. And I'm saying "here's my chief of staff," a really good guy, did a phenomenal job at RNC. I mean, he won the election, right?


And Trump's wrong anyway. Claims he "knows what's good, knows what's bad" but he has no idea. Arrogant, blind


	TRUMP: ...I think they don't believe it. I don't think the public - that's why the Rasmussen poll just has me through the roof.


he cares a lot about his public image? see him tweet this too

	I don't think they believe it. Well, I guess one of the reasons I'm here today is to tell you the whole Russian thing, that's a ruse. That's a ruse. And by the way, it would be great if we could get along with Russia, just so you understand that.

actually still wants to make his Russia deal? but seems to be really committed to "getting along" with Russia


------


	Hillary Clinton - that was the reset, remember it said reset? Now if I do that, oh, I'm a bad guy. If we could get along with Russia, that's a positive thing. We have a very talented man, Rex Tillerson, who's going to be meeting with them shortly and I told him. I said "I know politically it's probably not good for me." The greatest thing I could do is shoot that ship that's 30 miles off shore right out of the water.

	Everyone in this country's going to say "oh, it's so great." That's not great. That's not great. I would love to be able to get along with Russia. Now, you've had a lot of presidents that haven't taken that tack. Look where we are now. Look where we are now. So, if I can - now, I love to negotiate things, I do it really well, and all that stuff. But - but it's possible I won't be able to get along with Putin.

	Maybe it is. But I want to just tell you, the false reporting by the media, by you people, the false, horrible, fake reporting makes it much harder to make a deal with Russia. And probably Putin said "you know." He's sitting behind his desk and he's saying "you know, I see what's going on in the United States, I follow it closely. It's going to be impossible for President Trump to ever get along with Russia because of all the pressure he's got with this fake story." OK?


presumably, what Trump means when "the cloud" is getting in the way of his "deals"?

	And that's a shame because if we could get along with Russia - and by the way, China and Japan and everyone. If we could get along, it would be a positive thing, not a negative thing.


he doesn't understand you can't "just get along" with somebody who's trying to kill you

and clearly doesn't understand that he's the weapon


------


	MORE ON RUSSIA

	QUESTION: Mr. President, you mentioned Russia. Let's talk about some serious issues that have come up in the last week that you have had to deal with as president of the United States.

	TRUMP: OK.

	QUESTION: You mentioned the vessel -- the spy vessel off the coast of the United States.

	TRUMP: Not good.

	QUESTION: There was a ballistic missile test that many interpret as a violation of an agreement between the two countries; and a Russian plane buzzed a U.S. destroyer.

	TRUMP: Not good.


"Not good?"

Does Trump realize how soft on Russia he is? "it would be nice to get along with Russia," but that's "not good" that they broke an international ballistic missile treating and are moving around nuclear weapons


	QUESTION: I listened to you during the campaign ...

	TRUMP: Excuse me, excuse me. When did it happen? It happened when, if you were Putin right now, you would say, "Hey, we're back to the old games with the United States; there's no way Trump can ever do a deal with us." Because the -- you have to understand. If I was just brutal on Russia right now, just brutal, people would say, you would say, "Oh, isn't that wonderful." But I know you well enough.

	Then you would say, "Oh, he was too tough; he shouldn't have done that." Look, all of the...


It is weird, what's going on in his head that he's so soft on Russia but insults and bullies U.S. allies?

	TRUMP: All of those things that you mentioned are very recent, because probably Putin assumes that he's not going to be able to make a deal with me because it's politically not popular for me to make a deal. So Hillary Clinton tries a re-set. It failed. They all tried. But I'm different than those people.


oh god he really thinks he can make a peace deal


so like FDR, Obama, etc.

and he is arrogant enough to think he can make the ultimate deal to save the world or something


but it seems pretty clear--he wants to make his ultimate Russia deal, but the "fake news" is getting in the way.


	QUESTION: How are you interpreting those moves? And what do you intend to do about them? Have you given Rex Tillerson any advice or counsel on how to deal?

	TRUMP: I have. I have. And I'm so beautifully represented. I'm so honored that the Senate approved him. He's going to be fantastic.

	Yes, I think that I've already...

	QUESTION: Is Putin testing you, do you believe, sir?

	TRUMP: No, I don't think so. I think Putin probably assumes that he can't make a deal with me anymore because politically it would be unpopular for a politician to make a deal. I can't believe I'm saying I'm a politician, but I guess that's what I am now.

	Because, look, it would be much easier for me to be tough on Russia, but then we're not going to make a deal.


but doesn't he do the oppose with NATO? like bully them and strong-arm them?

one possibility iirc is he seemed to measure strength of a country in terms of the number of nuclear weapons they have, so could decide Russia has a lot of nukes therefore kiss their ass? another is he wanted to make a deal with the Sovietsd since 1987, so maybe built up a dream in his head of making the ultimate Russia deal


	Now, I don't know that we're going to make a deal. I don't know. We might. We might not. But it would be much easier for me to be so tough -- the tougher I am on Russia, the better. But you know what? I want to do the right thing for the American people. And to be honest, secondarily, I want to do the right thing for the world.

	If Russia and the United States actually got together and got along -- and don't forget, we're a very powerful nuclear country and so are they. There's no up-side. We're a very powerful nuclear country and so are they. I have been briefed. And I can tell you one thing about a briefing that we're allowed to say because anybody that ever read the most basic book can say it, nuclear holocaust would be like no other.

	They're a very powerful nuclear country and so are we. If we have a good relationship with Russia, believe me, that's a good thing, not a bad thing.


wow me might still actually want to do the 1987 "save the world from nuclear holocaust" deal

I would prefer nuclear holocaust to the world being ran by the Okhrana

consider that they would probably kill us all anyway... (didn't they try to start a nuclear war between Cuba and U.S.? China and U.S.? now North Korea?)

Did they technically start a nuclear war between Japan and U.S.?


The most import thing is to make sure Putin's fancy nuclear bunker is rigged to blow


------


	QUESTION: But do they damage the relationship? Do they undermine...

	TRUMP: They all happened recently.

	No...

	(CROSSTALK)

	QUESTION: ... this country's ability to work with Russia?

	TRUMP: They all happened recently. And I understand what they're doing because they're doing the same thing.

	Now, again, maybe I'm not going to be able to do a deal with Russia, but at least I will have tried. And if I don't, does anybody really think that Hillary Clinton would be tougher on Russia than Donald Trump? Does anybody in this room really believe that? OK?

	But I tell you one thing, she tried to make a deal. She had the re-set. She gave all that valuable uranium away. She did other things. You know, they say I'm close to Russia. Hillary Clinton gave away 20 percent of the uranium in the United States. She's close to Russia.

	QUESTION: Can we...

	TRUMP: I gave -- you know what I gave to Russia? You know what I gave? Nothing.


Trump aware he appears soft on Russia, guilty about it?


	QUESTION: Can we conclude there will be no response to these particular provocations?

	TRUMP: I'm not going to tell you anything about what response I do. I don't talk about military response. I don't say I'm going into Mosul in four months. "We are going to attack Mosul in four months." Then three months later, "We are going to attack Mosul in one month." "Next week, we are going to attack Mosul."

	In the meantime, Mosul is very, very difficult. Do you know why? Because I don't talk about military, and I don't talk about certain other things, you're going to be surprised to hear that. And by the way, my whole campaign, I'd say that. So I don't have to tell you. I don't want to be one of these guys that say, "Yes, here's what we're going to do." I don't have to do that. I don't have to tell you what I'm going to do in North Korea.

	(CROSSTALK)

	TRUMP: Wait a minute. I don't have to tell you what I'm going to do in North Korea. And I don't have to tell you what I'm going to do with Iran. You know why? Because they shouldn't know. And eventually, you guys are going to get tired of asking that question.

	:So when you ask me what am I going to do with a ship, the Russian ship as an example, I'm not going to tell you. But hopefully, I won't have to do anything, but I'm not going to tell you.

	OK.


Dodges question, sounds defensive? what is it, does he think appeasement works? or is he actually being blackmailed by them too?


------

	QUESTION: Thank you. I was just hoping that we could get a yes or no answer on one of these questions involving Russia. Can you say whether you are aware that anyone who advised your campaign had contacts with Russia during the course of the election?

	TRUMP: Well I told you, Gen. Flynn obviously was dealing. So that's one person. But he was dealing, as he should have been.

	TRUMP: No. Nobody that I know of. Nobody...

	QUESTION: So you're not aware of any contact during the course..

	TRUMP: Look, look, look...

	QUESTION: ... of the election?

	TRUMP: How many times do I have to answer this question?

	QUESTION: Can you just say yes or no?

	TRUMP: Russia is a ruse.


Offers Manafort in answer---guilty about it? 

	QUESTION: But in his capacity as your campaign manager, was he in touch with Russian officials during the election?

	TRUMP: You know what? He said no. I could only tell you what he -- now he was replaced long before the election. You know that, right?

	He was replaced long before the election. When all of this stuff started coming out, it came out during the election. But Paul Manafort, who's a good man also by the way, Paul Manfort was replaced long before the election took place. He was only there for a short period of time.


Trump aware of the reports about manafort that led to him getting fired? e.g.

http://www.nbcnews.com/news/us-news/donald-trump-aide-paul-manafort-scrutinized-russian-business-ties-n631241
	 Donald Trump’s campaign chairman was a key player in multi-million-dollar business propositions with Russian and Ukrainian oligarchs — one of them a close Putin ally with alleged ties to organized crime — which foreign policy experts say raises questions about the pro-Russian bent of the Trump candidacy.

	“The relationships that Trump’s advisors have had with pro-Russian forces are deeply disturbing,” said David Kramer, a former senior State Department official in the George W. Bush administration and a former adviser to Marco Rubio’s presidential campaign. “Trump’s attitude on Russia is not in line with most Republican foreign-policy thinking. Trump has staked out views that are really on the fringe.” 


https://www.nytimes.com/2016/08/15/us/politics/paul-manafort-ukraine-donald-trump.html
	Handwritten ledgers show $12.7 million in undisclosed cash payments designated for Mr. Manafort from Mr. Yanukovych’s pro-Russian political party from 2007 to 2012, according to Ukraine’s newly formed National Anti-Corruption Bureau. Investigators assert that the disbursements were part of an illegal off-the-books system whose recipients also included election officials.



------


http://www.latimes.com/politics/la-na-pol-trump-news-conference-transcript-20170216-story.html
	In many cases, not in all cases. And some of the cases, having DACA and they're gang members and they're drug dealers, too. But you have some absolutely, incredible kids, I would say mostly. They were brought here in such a way -- it's a very -- it's a very, very tough subject.

	We're gonna deal with DACA with heart. I have to deal with a lot of politicians, don't forget and I have to convince them that what I'm saying is -- is right. And I appreciate your understanding on that.

I thought they were "bad hombres," "rapists," and drug dealers? IIRC he had kids crying and hiding in closests while his deportation squads were out in force.


------

	QUESTION: (inaudible) ...not about your personality or your beliefs, talking about (inaudible), some of it by supporters in your name. What do you...

	TRUMP: ...And some of it - can I be honest with you? And this has to do with racism and horrible things that are put up. Some of it written by our opponents. You do know that. Do you understand that? You don't think anybody would do a thing like that. Some of the signs you'll see are not put up by the people that love or like Donald Trump, they're put up by the other side and you think it's like playing it straight?

	No. But you have some of those signs and some of that anger is caused by the other side. They'll do signs and they'll do drawings that are inappropriate. It won't be my people. It will be the people on the other side to anger people like you. OK.


fascinating--Trump thinks he's being framed (basically right afaik), lumps in "the other side" with people framing him--like he thinks Democrats are working in unison against him or something?


------------

More on Trump's case:

------

 
https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/06/08/trumps_lawyer_marc_kasowitz_press_conference_responds_to_james_comey_hearing.html
	As he said yesterday, the President feels completely vindicated and is eager to continue moving forward with his agenda with this public cloud removed.

all I could find about "cloud"


ok


------

http://www.latimes.com/projects/la-na-pol-comey-testimony-timeline/

oh look this is what I've been doing

	April 11: Phone call

	Tensions had been high when news broke that the FBI was monitoring communications of Trump campaign advisor Carter Page. The U.S. believed he was acting as a Russian agent. It was the latest story to fuel reports about the Russia investigation. Trump had made it repeatedly clear that he believes the investigation, and the attention to it, is a distraction.

	Three days after Trump fired Comey, the president insinuated that he had tangible evidence to dispel Comey’s claims about their private conversations.

missed that


------

Trump concerned about loyalty:


	HOLT: Were you angry with James Comey when he went public and said he can't support your unsubstantiated charges of wiretapping -- that your -- your predecessor wire tapped you?

	TRUMP: I was surprised he said it, but I wasn't angry. There's a big thing going on right now which is spying. And it's -- you can scroll to anything you want.

	The unmasking and the spying. And to me, that's the big story right now. That's a very, very big story.

	HOLT: You didn't take that as a sign that this loyalty that he came out and contradicted you?

	(CROSSTALK)

	TRUMP: No, I didn't -- I didn't -- I don't think of it as loyalty. I mean, I want whoever the director is, I want him to do the right thing.


Trump not thinking of loyalty when Comey contradicted his wiretapping claims


http://www.foxnews.com/transcript/2017/05/12/hannity-trump-should-replace-wh-briefings-with-tweets.html
	PIRRO: People suggest that the question that, apparently, The New York Times is selling, that you asked Comey whether or not you had his loyalty, was possibly inappropriate. Could you see how they would think that?

	TRUMP: No, I don't think -- I read that article. I don't think it's inappropriate, number one. It isn't--

	PIRRO: Did you ask that question?

	TRUMP: No. No, I didn't. But I don't think it would be a bad question to ask. I think loyalty to the country, loyalty to United States is important. You know, I mean, it depends on how you define loyalty, number one. And number two, I don't know how that got there because I didn't ask that question.

	PIRRO: What about the idea that in a tweet, you said that there might be tape recordings?

	TRUMP: Well, that I can't talk about. I won't talk about that. All I want is for Comey to be honest, and I hope he will be, and I'm sure he will be, I hope.


Trump did not ask Comey for "loyalty," just thinks it wouldn't be a bad question to ask.

Trump seems to define it as "loyalty to the United States"

trump lying sounds like (wouldn't think you'd risk putting lie in Comey sworn testimony), precluding his releasing of tapes or making it harder for him

amazing

a self-destructive moron

that might be their entire plan for him

the easiest man to do agent provocateure on in the world


------



Why Trump fired Comey:

https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/05/11/president_trumps_full_interview_with_lester_holt.html
	TRUMP: Look, he's a showboat. He's a grandstander.

	The FBI has been in turmoil. You know that, I know that, everybody knows that.

	You take a look at the FBI a year ago, it was in virtual turmoil -- less than a year ago. It hasn't recovered from that.


also because he accepted the reccomendation of Rosenstain and Sessions

essential to have "public trust and confidence" in FBI

because you cannot have confidence in a showboater. nor a grandstander.

	...But I said to myself I might even lengthen out the investigation. But I have to do the right thing for the American people.

	He's the wrong man for that position.


"He's the wrong man for that position."


	TRUMP: Because he told me that. I mean, he told me that.

	HOLT: He told you, you weren't under investigation with...

	TRUMP: Yeah, and I...

	HOLT: ...regard to the Russian investigation.

	TRUMP: ...I've heard that -- I've heard that from others. I think...

	HOLT: Was it in a phone call? Did you meet face to face?

	TRUMP: I actually asked him, yes. I said if it's possible, would you let me know am I under investigation. He said you are not under investigation.

	HOLT: But he's -- he's given sworn testimony that there's an ongoing investigation into the Trump campaign and possible collusion with the Russian government. You were the centerpiece of the Trump campaign.


perhaps a hidden reason that Trump did not want to state?

but it does seem like Trump not only wants people to know he's not under investigation, he wants people to know Comey said he's not under investigation

so Trump understands nobody trusts him


	I also want to have a really competent, capable director. He's not. He's a show boater.

	He's not my man or not my man. I didn't appoint him. He was appointed long before me.

	But I want somebody who's going to do a great job. 


so, Trump says Comey not competent or capable. But Comey is a show boater.


Comey is also not Trump's "man" (because) he was appointed [by Obama]


	...I will tell you, I think that -- I want very simply a great FBI director.


Comey "very simply" wants a "great FBI director"


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/862267781336752128
	Comey lost the confidence of almost everyone in Washington, Republican and Democrat alike. When things calm down, they will be thanking me!
	4:27 AM - 10 May 2017 


Trump says Comey lost confidence of everyone


seemed to have expected bipartisan support for firing Comey



------



Trump on Rosenstein memo:

	HOLT: Monday you met with the Deputy Attorney General Rod Rosenstein.

	TRUMP: Right.

	HOLT: Did you ask for a recommendation?

	TRUMP: What I did is I was going to fire Comey. My decision. It was not...

	HOLT: You had made the decision before they came into your office (ph).

	TRUMP: I -- I was going to fire Comey. I -- there's no good time to do it, by the way.


Trump was going to fire comey (because he's a showboat? grandstander?), but he realized there's no good time to do it.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/onpolitics/2017/05/09/full-text-trump-letter-comey-firing/101491982/
	Dear Director Comey:

	I have received the attached letters from the Attorney General and Deputy Attorney General of the United States recommending your dismissal as the Director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. I have accepted their recommendation and you are hereby terminated and removed from office, effective immediately.

	While I greatly appreciate you informing me, on three separate occasions, that I am not under investigation, I nevertheless concur with the judgement of the Department of Justice that you are not able to effectively lead the Bureau.

	It is essential that we find new leadership for the FBI that restores public trust and confidence in its vital law enforcement mission.

	I wish you the best of luck in your future endeavors.

	Donald J. Trump


------

Did Trump fire Comey because of the Russia investigation?

	HOLT: But were you a fan of...

	(CROSSTALK)

	TRUMP: ...people of the FBI.

	HOLT: him taking up that investigation?

	TRUMP: I think that -- about the Hillary Clinton investigation?

	HOLT: No, about -- about the Russian investigation and possible...

	TRUMP: No, I don't care...

	HOLT: ...links between...

	TRUMP: Look -- look, let me tell you. As far as I'm concerned, I want that thing to be absolutely done properly.

	When I did this now, I said I probably maybe will confuse people. Maybe I'll expand that -- you know, I'll lengthen the time because it should be over with. It should -- in my opinion, should've been over with a long time ago because it -- all it is an excuse.

	But I said to myself I might even lengthen out the investigation. But I have to do the right thing for the American people.

	He's the wrong man for that position.


"No, I don't care..."

Trump doesn't care about the Russia investigation?


Trump realizes he will "confuse" people, perhaps create the impression he is firing comey to obstruct the Russia investigation. He realizes what he did may even "lengthen" the investigation. But the investigation is all an excuse anyway.


	HOLT: Did you ask him to drop the investigation?

	TRUMP: No, never.

	HOLT: Did anyone from the White House...

	TRUMP: No. In fact, I want the investigation speeded up...


Trump didn't ask Comey to drop the investigation, he just wanted it over with


also says nobody from the WH asked him to end investigation

	HOLT: Any -- any surrogates on behalf of the White House?

	TRUMP: Not that I know of. Look, I want to find out if there was a problem with an election having to do with Russia. Or by the way any -- but -- any -- anybody else. Any other country.

	And I want that to be so strong and so good. And I want it to happen.


Trump wants the investigation. He wants it strong and "so good."



	HOLT: What you said a moment ago about supporting the idea of investigation. A lot of people would find it hard to believe that the man who just said that tweeted very recently it's a total hoax. It's a taxpayer charade.

	TRUMP: Oh, I think that looking into me and the campaign -- look, I have nothing to do -- this was set up by the Democrats. There is no collusion between me and my campaign and the Russians.

	The other thing is the Russians did not affect the vote. And everybody seems to think that.


Trump offers no assurance when questioned "why should we believe you when you say investigation is a hoax." his reply is the investigation is a hoax.

	HOLT: There is an investigation underway though, an FBI investigation. Is that a charade?

	TRUMP: Well, I don't know if it's an FBI or if it's -- there's so many investigations. I don't know if it's an FBI investigation or if it's Congress, if it's the Senate and the House...

	HOLT: Well, James Comey testified there was an FBI investigation...

	TRUMP: Well, yeah, but I think they're also helping the House and the Senate. So, you probably have FBI. But you have House, you have Senate. They have other investigations.


Trump puzzled when confronted with this quandry: if the investigation is by democrats, how is the FBI a democrat hoax?

but he concedes there is "probably" an FBI investigation

perhaps Trump realizes admitting the existence of an FBI investigationw would make him look even more guilty, even though he probably originally wasn't...


	HOLT: Well, James Comey testified there was an FBI investigation...

	TRUMP: Well, yeah, but I think they're also helping the House and the Senate. So, you probably have FBI. But you have House, you have Senate. They have other investigations.

	HOLT: But when you put out tweets it's a total hoax. It's a taxpayer charade. And you're looking for a new FBI director, are you not sending that person a message to lay off?

	TRUMP: No, I'm not doing that. I think that we have to get back to work. But I want to find out -- I want to get to the bottom.

	If Russia hacked -- if Russia did anything having to do with our election, I want to know about it.


Trump wants to get to the bottom of election hacking or "doing something to our election" specifically, mum on collusion. (well earlier says "there is no collusion"--but for his associates, how does he know?)


https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/05/11/president_trumps_full_interview_with_lester_holt.html
	HOLT: And will you expect if they would -- they would continue on with this investigation...

	TRUMP: Oh, yeah, sure. I expect that.


Trump would except new FBI director to continue with investigation


should Trump be under investigation?

	TRUMPS: ...to Lindsay Graham from one of the most prestigious law firms in the country -- a tremendous, highly rated law firm -- that I have nothing to do with Russia. I have no investments in Russia, none whatsoever.

	I don't have property in Russia -- a lot of people thought I owned office buildings in Moscow. I don't have property in Russia. And I am in very -- I -- I mean I -- I'm in total compliance in every way.

	Now, I have to tell you, I file documents -- hundreds of pages worth of documents with the Federal Elections Bureau. Everybody's seen that.

	I built a great company, but I'm not involved with Russia. I have had dealings over the years where I sold a house to a very wealthy Russian many years ago.

	I had the Miss Universe pageant, which I owned for quite a while. I had it in Moscow a long time ago.

	But other than that, I have nothing to do with Russia.


Trumps has nothing to do with Russia, except miss universe and selling a house once

IIRC his lawyers also said he had a few dealings with Russians in his tax returns

	HOLT: And one last question on this matter. Did you ever...

	TRUMP: And I have a certified letter, just so you understand. I'm not just saying that. I've given the letter -- I've given the letter to Senator Lindsay Graham.

	He has the letter. And I think frankly, it's -- I assume he's going to give the letter out.

	But it says: "I am not involved in Russia." No loans, no nothing.


Trump reall insists, really wants you to know he has nothing to do with Russia


http://chicago.suntimes.com/news/transcript-president-trump-colombian-president-santos-presser/
	Q    Next question.  As you look back over the past six months or year, have you had any recollection where you’ve wondered if anything you have done has been something that might be worthy of criminal charges in these investigations or impeachment, as some on the left are implying?

	PRESIDENT TRUMP:  I think it’s totally ridiculous.  Everybody thinks so.  And again, we have to get back to working our country properly so that we can take care of the problems that we have.  We have plenty of problems.  We’ve done a fantastic job.  We have a tremendous group of people.  Millions and millions of people out there that are looking at what you had just said, and said, “What are they doing?”

	Director Comey was very unpopular with most people.  I actually thought when I made that decision — and I also got a very, very strong recommendation, as you know, from the Deputy Attorney General, Rod Rosenstein.  But when I made that decision, I actually thought that it would be a bipartisan decision, because you look at all of the people on the Democratic side — not only the Republican side — they were saying such terrible things about Director Comey.


Trump thought left and right would be happy he fired Comey

	Then he had the very poor performance on Wednesday.  That was a poor, poor performance.  So poor, in fact, that I believe — and you’d have to ask him, because I don’t like to speak for other people — but I believe that’s why the Deputy Attorney General went out and wrote his very, very strong letter.

cites Comey's poor performance on May 3rd hearing

	We need a great director of the FBI.  I cherish the FBI.  It’s special.  All over the world, no matter where you go, the FBI is special.  The FBI has not had that special reputation with what happened in the campaign, what happened with respect to the Clinton campaign, and even you could say — directly or indirectly — with respect to the much more successful Trump campaign.


also cites FBI soiled reputation due to actions during campaign (which came up in May 3rd hearing more or less)



------

Trump angry?


	HOLT: Were you angry with James Comey when he went public and said he can't support your unsubstantiated charges of wiretapping -- that your -- your predecessor wire tapped you?

	TRUMP: I was surprised he said it, but I wasn't angry. There's a big thing going on right now which is spying. And it's -- you can scroll to anything you want.


Trump was not angry when he learned comey dismissed wiretapping charges. (Trump also believes anything on computers is automatically hacked and available to anybody, which is basically true, except for the law getting in the way...)


https://twitter.com/mitchellvii/status/844707663187456000
	Donald J. Trump Retweeted
	Bill Mitchell Verified account @mitchellvii Mar 22

	EXACTLY AS I SAID - House Intel Chair: We Cannot Rule Out Sr. Obama Officials Were Involved in Trump Surveillance

	http://www.thegatewaypundit.com/2017/03/boom-house-intel-chair-cannot-rule-sr-obama-officials-involved-trump-surveillance/

hmm but here is trump (two days later) coming out on twitter, all caps, with evidence from the "Gateway Pundit" saying otherwise


	HOLT: And what about when he went public and said that there was in fact an FBI investigation looking at your campaign and Russia? Did that anger you?

	I -- I ask that because...

	TRUMP: Well, I -- I -- you know I have that...

	HOLT: ...there's a -- a sense that you...

	TRUMP: ...I have that...

	HOLT: ...that there was a building anger.

	TRUMP: No, no, no. I -- I know every once in a while, you'll see that in the newspaper, anger somebody will report or they'll have false sources that maybe don't exist because of the media -- the way the media is. No.

	I will tell you, I think that -- I want very simply a great FBI director.


Trump was not angry that there was an FBI investigation into his campaign and Russia, and reports otherwise are fake news.


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/861713823505494016
	The Russia-Trump collusion story is a total hoax, when will this taxpayer funded charade end?
	3:46 PM - 8 May 2017 


but he seems angry here after the yates testimony for one

which did at least mention the FBI investigations


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/861713823505494016
	The Russia-Trump collusion story is a total hoax, when will this taxpayer funded charade end?
	3:46 PM - 8 May 2017 


seems to be getting angry at something here


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/848153860602507264
	When will Sleepy Eyes Chuck Todd and @NBCNews start talking about the Obama SURVEILLANCE SCANDAL and stop with the Fake Trump/Russia story?
	5:43 AM - 1 Apr 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/848158641056362496
	It is the same Fake News Media that said there is "no path to victory for Trump" that is now pushing the phony Russia story. A total scam!
	6:02 AM - 1 Apr 2017 


and here


------

Trump on problems with Flynn:


http://chicago.suntimes.com/news/transcript-president-trump-colombian-president-santos-presser/

	Q    Thank you, Mr. President.  In the light of a very busy news week, a lot of people would like to get to the bottom of a couple of things, give you a chance to go on record here.  Did you at any time urge former FBI Director James Comey in any way, shape, or form to close or to back down the investigation into Michael Flynn?

	And also as you look back —

	PRESIDENT TRUMP:  No.  No.  Next question.


Trump never asked Comey to close or back down the investigation into Michael Flynn



	HOLT: General Flynn is a part of this investigation as you know. Sally Yates recently testified that the White House was notified that he had been compromised, he was at risk of...

	TRUMP: Yeah.

	HOLT: ...of being blackmailed. It was 18 days later that he was finally fired.

	During that 18 days, he had access, I assume, to all the nation's top secrets. One day you meet on the issue of Comey...

	TRUMP: Right.

	HOLT: ...and you fire him in a humiliating way, while he's sitting in a room with his colleagues and it's appearing on the TV.

	TRUMP: Because my White House counsel Don McGahn came back to me and did not sound like an emergency of any -- he didn't make it sound like he was, you know -- and she actually didn't make it sound that way, either in the hearings the other day. Like it had to be done immediately.


But she did make it sound that way in the hearings...

But Trump says Yates didn't make it sound like Flynn had to be fired immediately

"one day you meet on the issue of Comey" refers to what?

	This man has served for many years. He's a general. He's a, in my opinion, a very good person.

	I believe that it would be very unfair to hear from somebody who we don't even know and immediately run out and fire a general. Now...


Trump also says it would be "very unfair" to fire Flynn after hearing from somebody he doesn't know and "runing and immediately firing" him

(so when do you fire him then? when the leaks are too much?)


	TRUMP: My White House counsel came to me. They had, I believe, two meetings. And we ultimately fired -- but we fired for a different reason.

	HOLT: You're talking about General Flynn? TRUMP: General Flynn, yes.

	HOLT: Because -- because of lying to the vice president.

	TRUMP: Yeah, but everything plays in -- everything plays into it. But we fired him because he said something to the vice president that was not so.


Trump says firing Flynn because he lied to Pence was a "different reason" than what Yates warned him about.

Trump did not know Flynn received payments from the Russian or Turkish government.

	TRUMP: No, but Obama perhaps knew because he had clearance from the Obama administration. And his -- and -- and this is something they never want to report.

	He had clearance from the Obama administration, the highest clearance you can have. And I think it's a very unfair thing that the media doesn't talk about that.

	You know, you're talking about 2015. I don't know that I knew him in 2015.


oh wow he was busy dsparaging Obama and screwed up and admitting he did know?

so did he know Flynn was under investigation for violating FARA...



https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/859601184285491201
	FBI Director Comey was the best thing that ever happened to Hillary Clinton in that he gave her a free pass for many bad deeds! The phony...
	7:51 PM - 2 May 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/859604996236742656
	...Trump/Russia story was an excuse used by the Democrats as justification for losing the election. Perhaps Trump just ran a great campaign?



https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/05/11/president_trumps_full_interview_with_lester_holt.html
	TRUMP: Not that I know of. Look, I want to find out if there was a problem with an election having to do with Russia. Or by the way any -- but -- any -- anybody else. Any other country.

	And I want that to be so strong and so good. And I want it to happen.

	I also want to have a really competent, capable director. He's not. He's a show boater.

	He's not my man or not my man. I didn't appoint him. He was appointed long before me.



https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/05/11/president_trumps_full_interview_with_lester_holt.html
	HOLT: Were you angry with James Comey when he went public and said he can't support your unsubstantiated charges of wiretapping -- that your -- your predecessor wire tapped you?

	TRUMP: I was surprised he said it, but I wasn't angry. There's a big thing going on right now which is spying. And it's -- you can scroll to anything you want.




------


	HOLT: Did you worry at all when you made the decision to fire Comey when you did, the day before Lavrov was here in the White House and -- and the Russian Ambassador. Did you think through the optics of a way this would look?

	TRUMP: I never thought about -- it was set up a while ago. And frankly, I could've waited. But what difference does it make?


Trump never thought about optics of meeting with Lavrov after firing Comey


(I wonder if that's all he was thinking about? removing "cloud" so he could make his "deals" with the Russians, like he always wanted [since 1987!])

True he set it up a while ago?


http://www.politico.com/magazine/story/2017/05/10/james-comey-firing-trump-lavrov-putin-215124

https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/inside-the-oval-office-with-trump-and-the-russians-broad-smiles-and-loose-lips/2017/05/16/2e8b0d14-3a66-11e7-8854-21f359183e8c_story.html
	On May 2, eight days before Lavrov showed up at the White House, Russian President Vladi­mir Putin was on the phone with Trump and made a request. ­Putin had “new ideas” about stopping the civil war carnage in Syria, according to a senior U.S. official, and noted that his top diplomat, Lavrov, would soon be visiting the United States for a previously scheduled meeting with Secretary of State Rex Tillerson.

	“Will you see him?” Putin asked Trump, according to the official, who spoke on the condition of anonymity to describe the private talks.

	“Yes,” Trump replied.

	...Trump on Tuesday said that his meeting with Lavrov was “very, very successful” and that it was a precursor to “a lot of great success over the next coming years” in fighting global terrorism.

Trump's plan to team up with Putin against ISIS he keeps talking about?

	...In one important respect, the Trump administration’s hand might have been forced. After Putin received Tillerson in Moscow last month — meeting privately with the secretary of state for two hours at the Kremlin — the United States owed reciprocity to Russia in the form of an audience with Trump for Tillerson’s Russian counterpart, Lavrov. Rejecting Putin’s request for a Trump-Lavrov meeting would have represented a breach in diplomatic tradition.

interesting--a way to pressure Trump? "I did the same for you"

	The date was set before Trump knew he would be firing James B. Comey as FBI director on the afternoon of May 9. The president’s advisers knew the optics would be bad politically, one of them said, but calculated that the fallout would be just as bad if Trump abruptly canceled on Lavrov, so he kept the appointment.

wait what? saying not firing Comey precludes the Lavrov meeting? also contradicts what Trump said about the optics


some sources say 8 days before meeting, so May 2--same day he tweets "Comey best thing that ever happened to Clinton"--probably the worst insult Trump can think of

wonder if Trump decided to fire Comey before then? or specifically for the meeting to make his "deals" easier?



	I'm not looking for cosmetics. I'm looking to do a great job for the country.  

	I'm looking to create jobs. I'm looking to create strength and security. I'm looking to have strong borders.

	I'm looking for things like that. I think it's really a good thing that I meet with people.


you'd think if he cares about leaks he cares about cosmetics...


	Now, this is a public meeting. Because, you know, when you cover this, the people watching may say oh, he met with Lavrov.

	Well, this was announced that I'm meeting with Lavrov. Just like a number of days ago, I spoke -- had a very good conversation -- very public in the sense that everybody knew this was taking place.


closed to the press


	I meet -- I -- I talk all the time. Just spoke with the head of -- the new head of South Korea who just got elected. I speak with the head of India.

	I speak with the head of China. I have to speak with Putin also. It's called Russia.

	But when I spoke with Putin, he asked me whether or not I would see Lavrov. Now, what do I -- should I say no, I'm not going to see him? I said, I will see him.


unusual to meet diplomat in oval office apparently


	During that discussion with Lavrov, I think we had a great discussion having to do with Syria, having to do with the Ukraine. And maybe, that discussion will lead to a lot less people getting killed and will lead ultimately to peace.

	So, I'm -- I'm OK with those discussions, Lester. I think it's a good thing, not a bad thing.


Trump sounds honest, like he thinks can actually make peace

kindof like FDR? Obama I guess too?


------


http://www.nbcnews.com/politics/politics-news/fact-checking-donald-trump-s-interview-nbc-s-lester-holt-n757981


-
------


http://us.blastingnews.com/news/2017/03/comeys-silence-triggers-angry-trump-tweet-001563049.html
	President Donald #trump took #Fbi Director James B. Comey to his Twitter woodshed even before he finished testifying Monday before the House Intelligence Committee.

	“FBI Director Comey refuses to deny he briefed President Obama on calls made by Michael Flynn to Russia,” Trump tweeted, apparently ticked off that Comey’s testimony was not destined to corroborate Trump’s wiretapping claim.

sounds like Trump was angry after all


http://time.com/4710456/donald-trump-time-interview-truth-falsehood/

	So you don’t feel like Comey’s testimony in any way takes away from the credibility of the tweets you put out, even with the quotes?

	No, I have, look. I have articles saying it happened. But you have to take a look at what they, they just went out at a news conference. Devin Nunes had a news conference. I mean I don’t know, I was unable to see it, because I am at meetings, but they just had a news conference talking about surveillance. Now again, it is in quotes. That means surveillance and various other things. And the New York Times had a front-page story, which they actually reduced, they took it, they took it the word wiretapping out of the title, but its first story in the front page of the paper was wiretapping. And a lot of information has just been learned, and a lot of information may be learned over the next coming period of time. We will see what happens. Look. I predicted a lot of things that took a little of bit of time. Here, headline, for the front page of the New York Times, "Wiretapped data used in inquiry of Trump aides." That’s a headline. Now they then dropped that headline, I never saw this until this morning. They then dropped that headline, and they used another headline without the word wiretap, but they did mean wiretap. Wiretapped data used in inquiry. Then changed after that, they probably didn’t like it. And they changed the title. They took the wiretap word out.


Trump sounds like he thinks he's being cheated.


------


http://time.com/4710456/donald-trump-time-interview-truth-falsehood/

	One of my ideas here is that throughout the campaign and now as president, you have used disputed statements, this is one of them that is disputed, the claim that three million undocumented people voted in the election…

	Well I think I will be proved right about that too.

	The claim that Muslims celebrated on 9-11 in New Jersey…

	Well if you look at the reporter, he wrote the story in the Washington Post.


Trump will cite WaPo if it helps his cause?

	Did you see the Wall Street Journal opinion page today, the editorial page?

	I thought it was, I thought it was a disgrace that they could write that.


but still seems to have higher standards for WSJ


	That is different than the president wiretapping you which would be a crime outside of a court.

	Well I don’t know where these wiretaps came from. They came from someplace. That is what they should find out. And you know the real story here is about the leakers. OK? You don’t write about that. But the real story here is, who released General Flynn’s name? Who released, who released my conversations with Australia, and who released my conversation with Mexico? To me, Michael, that’s the story, these leakers, they are disgusting. These are horrible people.


	...But isn’t there, it strikes me there is still an issue of credibility. If the intelligence community came out and said, we have determined that so and so is the leaker here, but you are saying to me now, that you don’t believe the intelligence community when they say your tweet was wrong.

	I’m not saying—no, I’m not blaming. First of all, I put Mike Pompeo in. I put Senator Dan Coats in. These are great people. I think they are great people and they are going to, I have a lot of confidence in them. So hopefully things will straighten out. But I inherited a mess, I inherited a mess in so many ways. I inherited a mess in the Middle East, and a mess with North Korea, I inherited a mess with jobs, despite the statistics, you know, my statistics are even better, but they are not the real statistics because you have millions of people that can’t get a job, ok. And I inherited a mess on trade. I mean we have many, you can go up and down the ladder. But that’s the story. Hey look, in the mean time, I guess, I can’t be doing so badly, because I’m president, and you’re not. You know. Say hello to everybody OK?

	Thank you very much, Mr. President. 


what a fucking asshole


but again makes it clear he thinks it's all the Obama administration's fault


------

